ru: Формфактор трекера: Блок для велорамы; Карта; Авиационный комплект ADS-B; Проводной автомобильный блок; Брелок-метка; Магнитный модуль; Модульная плата; OBD-разъём; Спутниковый коммуникатор; Носимый маяк; Другой
pl: Współczynnik formy trackera: Jednostka do ramy roweru; Karta; Zestaw lotniczy ADS-B; Jednostka na stałe podłączana do pojazdu; Brelok; Moduł magnetyczny; Płytka modułowa; Wtyczka OBD; Komunikator satelitarny; Nadajnik do noszenia; Inne
ja: トラッカーフォームファクター: 自転車フレームユニット; カード型; フライトADS-Bキット; 車両固定配線ユニット; キーチェーンタグ; マグネットモジュール; モジュールボード; OBDプラグ; 衛星通信機; ウェアラブルビーコン; その他
pt-PT: Fator de forma do rastreador: Unidade para quadro de bicicleta; Cartão; Kit ADS-B de aviação; Unidade veicular com ligação direta; Etiqueta de porta-chaves; Módulo magnético; Placa modular; Ficha OBD; Comunicador por satélite; Baliza portátil; Outro
es: Factor de forma del rastreador: Unidad para cuadro de bicicleta; Tarjeta; Kit de vuelo ADS-B; Unidad vehicular cableada; Etiqueta de llavero; Módulo magnético; Placa modular; Conector OBD; Comunicador satelital; Baliza portátil; Otros
de: Tracker-Formfaktor: Fahrradrahmen-Einheit; Karte; Flug-ADS-B-Kit; Festverdrahtete Fahrzeugeinheit; Schlüsselanhänger; Magnetmodul; Modulplatine; OBD-Stecker; Satellitenkommunikator; Tragbares Ortungsgerät; Sonstiges
it: Fattore di forma del tracker: Unità per telaio bici; Scheda; Kit volo ADS-B; Unità veicolo cablata; Portachiavi; Modulo magnetico; Scheda modulo; Connettore OBD; Comunicatore satellitare; Beacon indossabile; Altro
sv: Sändarens formfaktor: Cykelramenhet; Kort; Flyg-ADS-B-sats; Hårdkopplad fordonsenhet; Nyckelringsbricka; Magnetmodul; Modulkort; OBD-kontakt; Satellitkommunikator; Bärbar sändare; Övrigt
fi: Seurantalaitteen muototekijä: Pyörärunkoyksikkö; Kortti; Lento ADS-B -paketti; Kiinteästi kytketty ajoneuvoyksikkö; Avaimenperätunniste; Magneettimoduuli; Moduulilevy; OBD-pistoke; Satelliittiviestintälaite; Puettava majakka; Muu
da: Tracker-formfaktor: Cykelrammeenhed; Kort; Fly ADS-B kit; Fastkoblet køretøjsenhed; Nøgleringsbrik; Magnetisk modul; Modulkort; OBD-stik; Satellitkommunikator; Bærbart beacon; Andet
pt-BR: Fator de forma do rastreador: Unidade para quadro de bicicleta; Cartão; Kit de voo ADS-B; Unidade veicular fixa; Chaveiro; Módulo magnético; Placa modular; Conector OBD; Comunicador via satélite; Sinalizador vestível; Outro
th: รูปแบบอุปกรณ์ติดตาม: อุปกรณ์ติดเฟรมจักรยาน; บัตร; ชุดอุปกรณ์ ADS-B สำหรับการบิน; อุปกรณ์ต่อสายยานพาหนะ; แท็กพวงกุญแจ; โมดูลแม่เหล็ก; บอร์ดโมดูล; ปลั๊ก OBD; เครื่องสื่อสารดาวเทียม; บีคอนแบบสวมใส่; อื่นๆ
ko: 트래커 형태: 자전거 프레임 유닛; 카드; 비행 ADS-B 키트; 차량 고정 배선 유닛; 열쇠고리 태그; 자석 모듈; 모듈 보드; OBD 플러그; 위성 통신기; 웨어러블 비콘; 기타
tr: İzleyici form faktörü: Bisiklet şasi ünitesi; Kart; Uçuş ADS-B kiti; Kablolu araç ünitesi; Anahtarlık etiketi; Manyetik modül; Modül kartı; OBD fişi; Uydu iletişim cihazı; Giyilebilir işaretçi; Diğer
sl-SI: Oblika sledilnika: Enota za okvir kolesa; Kartica; Letalski komplet ADS-B; Trdo priključena vozna enota; Obesek za ključe; Magnetni modul; Modulska plošča; OBD vtič; Satelitski komunikator; Nosljiv oddajnik; Drugo
el: Μορφή ανιχνευτή: Μονάδα σκελετού ποδηλάτου; Κάρτα; Κιτ πτήσης ADS-B; Ενσύρματη μονάδα οχήματος; Ετικέτα μπρελόκ; Μαγνητική μονάδα; Πλακέτα μονάδας; Βύσμα OBD; Δορυφορικός επικοινωνητής; Φορητός φάρος; Άλλο
hr-HR: Oblik pratilca: Jedinica za okvir bicikla; Kartica; Komplet za letove ADS-B; Fiksno spojena jedinica za vozilo; Privjesak za ključeve; Magnetski modul; Modularna ploča; OBD utikač; Satelitski komunikator; Nosivi odašiljač; Ostalo
zh-CN: 追踪器外形: 自行车车架装置; 卡片; 飞行 ADS-B 套件; 硬连线车载装置; 钥匙链标签; 磁性模块; 模块板; OBD 插头; 卫星通信器; 可穿戴信标; 其他
nl: Tracker vormfactor: Fietsframe-unit; Kaart; Vlucht ADS-B kit; Vast aangesloten voertuigunit; Sleutelhanger tag; Magnetische module; Modulebord; OBD-stekker; Satellietcommunicator; Draagbaar baken; Andere
bg-BG: Типоразмер на тракера: Устройство за велосипедна рамка; Карта; Комплект за полет ADS-B; Жично свързано устройство за превозно средство; Ключодържател таг; Магнитен модул; Модулна платка; OBD щепсел; Сателитен комуникатор; Носим маяк; Други
hu: Követő eszköz formátuma: Kerékpárváz egység; Kártya; Repülési ADS-B készlet; Vezetékes járműegység; Kulcstartó címke; Mágneses modul; Modul panel; OBD csatlakozó; Műholdas kommunikátor; Viselhető jeladó; Egyéb
zh-TW: 追蹤器外型規格: 自行車車架裝置; 卡片式; 飛行 ADS-B 套件; 車載硬接線裝置; 鑰匙圈標籤; 磁性模組; 模組板; OBD 插頭; 衛星通訊器; 穿戴式信標; 其他
lt-LT: Sekiklio formos faktorius: Dviračio rėmo įrenginys; Kortelė; Skrydžio ADS-B rinkinys; Stacionarus transporto priemonės įrenginys; Raktų pakabukas; Magnetinis modulis; Modulio plokštė; OBD kištukas; Palydovinis komunikatorius; Dėvimas švyturys; Kita
vi: Hình thức thiết bị theo dõi: Thiết bị khung xe đạp; Thẻ; Bộ ADS-B cho máy bay; Thiết bị nối dây cho xe; Thẻ móc khóa; Mô-đun từ tính; Bo mạch mô-đun; Phích cắm OBD; Thiết bị liên lạc vệ tinh; Thiết bị báo hiệu đeo được; Khác
cs: Provedení trackeru: Jednotka na rám kola; Karta; Letecká ADS-B sada; Pevně zapojená vozidlová jednotka; Přívěsek na klíče; Magnetický modul; Modulová deska; OBD konektor; Satelitní komunikátor; Nositelný maják; Jiné
en: Tracker form factor: Bike frame unit; Card; Flight ADS-B kit; Hardwired vehicle unit; Keychain tag; Magnetic module; Module board; OBD plug; Satellite communicator; Wearable beacon; Other
ro-RO: Factorul de formă al trackerului: Unitate pentru cadru bicicletă; Card; Kit de zbor ADS-B; Unitate vehicul cu cablaj fix; Breloc; Modul magnetic; Placă modul; Mufă OBD; Comunicator satelit; Baliză purtabilă; Altele
sk-SK: Formát trackera: Jednotka na rám bicykla; Karta; Letová sada ADS-B; Pevne zapojená vozidlová jednotka; Prívesok na kľúče; Magnetický modul; Modulová doska; OBD zástrčka; Satelitný komunikátor; Nositeľný maják; Iné
nb: Sporingsformfaktor: Sykkelrammeenhet; Kort; Flyg-ADS-B-sett; Hardkoblet kjøretøyenhet; Nøkkelringbrikke; Magnetisk modul; Modulkort; OBD-plugg; Satellittkommunikator; Bærbar beacon; Annet
fr: Facteur de forme du tracker: Unité pour cadre de vélo; Carte; Kit ADS-B de vol; Unité véhicule câblée; Porte-clés; Module magnétique; Carte module; Prise OBD; Communicateur satellite; Balise portable; Autre